Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB80.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending Section 145 of the Constitution of
Kentucky to automatically restore the voting rights of persons who have been convicted
of a felony not involving treason, bribery in an election, election fraud, a violent felony
offense, a felony sexual offense, or a criminal offense against a child upon the completion
of any term of imprisonment, probation, or parole, as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 145 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
Every citizen of the United States of the age of eighteen years who has resided in
the state one year, and in the county six months, and the precinct in which he or she
offers to vote sixty days next preceding the election, shall be a voter in said precinct and
not elsewhere. No person who is not a citizen of the United States shall be allowed to
vote in this state. The following persons also shall not have the right to vote:
1. Persons convicted in any court of competent jurisdiction of treason,[ or
felony, or] bribery in an election, election fraud, a violent felony offense, a felony
sexual offense, or a criminal offense against a child[ or of such high misdemeanor as
the General Assembly may declare shall operate as an exclusion from the right of
suffrage], but persons hereby excluded may be restored to their civil rights by executive
pardon.
2. Persons convicted in any court of competent jurisdiction of a felony until
completion of any term of imprisonment, probation, or parole, exclusive of restitution,
fines, and any other court ordered monetary conditions, unless restored to their civil
rights earlier by executive pardon.
3. Persons who, at the time of the election, are in confinement under the
judgment of a court for some penal offense.
Page 1 of 3
BR027400.100 - 274 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 274
4[3]. Persons who have been determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to
be mentally incompetent and who have not retained their voting rights or had those
rights restored[Idiots and insane persons].
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
Page 2 of 3
BR027400.100 - 274 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 274
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
BR027400.100 - 274 - XXXX 2/20/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed